Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.456, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Legislative auditor. Whenever an employee or officer of the state, University of Minnesota, or other organization listed in section 3.971, subdivision 6, discovers evidence of theft, embezzlement, or unlawful use of public funds or property, the employee or officernew text begin shall promptly report to law enforcement andnew text end shalldeleted text begin , except when to do so would knowingly impede or otherwise interfere with an ongoing criminal investigation,deleted text end promptly report in writing to the legislative auditor a detailed description of the alleged incident or incidents.